Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.540

Acting as harbor line commission.

The board acting as the harbor line commission shall keep a full and complete record of its proceedings relating to the establishment of harbor lines and the determination of harbor areas. The board shall have the power from time to time to make and enforce rules for the carrying out of the provisions of chapters 79.105 through 79.140 RCW relating to its duties not inconsistent with law.

[ 2005 c 155 s 103; 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 14. Formerly RCW 79.90.080.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 155: See RCW 79.105.001.